index.dic
бая/Z0Z3Z6
благоухая/Z0Z4Z6
вая/Z0Z3Z6
вбия/T0Z7
вдамъ/X0X1
веза/X0X1
взема/Z1Z5
взра/Z0Z5Z6
вия/T0T2Z7
вкова/X0X1
влѣза/Z2
влѣка/Y0Y1Y2
внеса/Y0Y1
впия/T0Z7
вра/Z0Z5Z6
врека/Y0Y1
всмуча/Y0Y1
всѣка/Y0Y1
втека/Y0
втрия/T0Z7
втрѣса/Y0Y1
втъка/Y3Y4
вшия/T0Z7
въвлѣка/Y0Y1
въвра/Z0Z5
възвия/T0Z7
въздамъ/X0X1
въззема/Z1Z5
възлѣза/Z2
възнеса/Y0Y1
възпра/Z0Z5
възприема/Z1Z5
възсъздамъ/X0X1
вямъ/Z0Z5
главозамая/Z0Z3
греба/X0X1X2
гриза/X0X1
дамъ/X0X1
добия/T0Z7
довия/T0Z7
довлѣка/Y0Y1
доеба/XXX0X1
доизпия/T0Z7
доизсѣка/Y0Y1
доизямъ/Z0Z5
докова/X0X1
домия/T0Z7
донаеба/XXX0X1
донеса/Y0Y1
допека/Y0Y1
допия/T0Z7
доплача/Y0
допра/Z0Z5
допредамъ/X0X1
допринеса/Y0
доразвия/T0Z7
доразкрия/T0Z7
дорека/Y0
досипя/X0X1
досѣка/Y0Y1
дотека/Y0
дотрая/Z0Z3
дотъка/Y3Y4
доубия/T0Z7
дочуя/T0Z7
доямъ/Z0Z5
дрѣмя/X0X2
дуя/T0T2Z7
дъвча/Y0Y1Y2
еба/XXX0X1X2
забия/T0Z7
завзема/Z1Z5
завия/T0Z7
завлѣка/Y0Y1
завра/Z0Z5
завтека/Y0
загриза/X0X1
задамъ/X0X1
задуя/T0Z7
задъвча/Y0Y1
заеба/XXX0X1
заема/Z1Z5
заизвия/T0Z7
заизлѣза/Z2
заклепя/X0X1
закова/X0X1
закрия/T0Z7
залая/Z0Z3
залъжа/Y0Y1
залѣза/Z2
замая/Z0Z3
замия/T0Z7
замра/Z0
занеса/Y0Y1
запаса/Y0Y1
запека/Y0Y1
запия/T0Z7
заплача/Y0
заплюя/T0Z7
заподозра/Z0Z5
запозная/U0Z7
запра/Z0Z5
зарека/Y0Y1
зареча/Y0Y1
зария/T0Z7
засипя/X0X1
засмуча/Y0Y1
заснема/Z1Z5
застържа/Y0Y1
засуча/Y0Y1
засѣка/Y0Y1
затека/Y0
затрия/T0Z7
затрѣса/Y0Y1
затѫпча/Y0
захапя/X0X1
зачуя/T0Z7
зашия/T0Z7
защипя/X0X1
заямъ/Z0Z5
знамъ/Z1
зная/Z0Z3Z4Z6
зобя/X0X1X2
зова/X0X1X2
зра/Z0Z6
избия/T0Z7
избуя/T0Z7
извая/Z0Z3
извеза/X0X1
извия/T0Z7
извлѣка/Y0Y1
изгриза/X0X1
издамъ/X0X1
издуя/T0Z7
иззема/Z1Z5
изкапя/X0X1
изкова/X0X1
изкълва/X0X1
изкѫпя/X0X1
излая/Z0
излъжа/Y0Y1
излѣза/Z2
измия/T0Z7
измра/Z0
изнаизлѣза/Z2
изнеса/Y0Y1
изора/X0X1
изпаса/Y0Y1
изпека/Y0
изпия/T0Z7
изплача/Y0Y1
изплюя/T0Z7
изпокрия/T0Z7
изпонапия/T0Z7
изпосѣка/Y0Y1
изпотрепя/X0X1
изпотѫпча/Y0Y1
изпохапя/X0X1
изпоямъ/Z0Z5
изпродамъ/X0X1
изрека/Y0Y1
изрия/T0Z7
изсипя/X0X1
изскубя/X0X1
изсмуча/Y0Y1
изстрижа/Y0Y1
изстържа/Y0Y1
изсуча/Y0Y1
изсѣка/Y0Y1
изтека/Y0
изтрая/Z0Z3
изтрепя/X0X1
изтрия/T0Z7
изтъка/Y3Y4
изтѫпча/Y0Y1
изуя/T0Z7
изхапя/X0X1
изшия/T0Z7
изщипя/X0X1
изямъ/Z0Z5
капя/X0X2
касая/Z0Z6
кая/Z0Z6
клепя/X0X1
кова/X0X1X2
крия/T0T2Z7
кълва/X0X1X2
кѫпя/X0X1X2
лая/Z0Z6
лъжа/Y0Y1Y2
мая/Z0Z6
мия/T0T2Z7
мра/Z0Z6
набая/Z0Z3
набия/T0Z7
навзема/Z1Z5
навия/T0Z7
навлѣза/Z2
навлѣка/Y0Y1
навра/Z0Z5
нагния/T0Z7
нагриза/X0X1
надвзема/Z1Z5
надвия/T0Z7
надвнеса/Y0Y1
наддамъ/X0X1
надзема/Z1Z5
надонеса/Y0
надуя/T0Z7
надямъ/Z0Z5
наеба/XXX0X1
наема/Z1Z5
назема/Z1
назова/X0X1
наизлѣза/Z2
накапя/X0X1
наклепя/X0X1
накълва/X0X1
налая/Z0Z3
нанеса/Y0Y1
наоблѣка/Y0Y1
напаса/Y0Y1
напека/Y0Y1
напия/T0Z7
наплача/Y0
наплюя/T0Z7
нарека/Y0
нария/T0Z7
насвия/T0Z7
насипя/X0X1
наскубя/X0X1
настрижа/Y0Y1
настържа/Y0Y1
насуча/Y0
насѣка/Y0Y1
натека/Y0
натепя/X0X1
натрия/T0Z7
натъка/Y3Y4
натѫпча/Y0Y1
нахапя/X0X1
нашия/T0Z7
наямъ/Z0Z5
недочуя/T0Z7
недоямъ/Z0Z5
нехая/Z0Z4
обая/Z0Z3Z4
обвия/T0Z7
обема/Z1
обзема/Z1Z5
облѣка/Y0Y1
обоснова/X0X1
обрека/Y0Y1
обсипя/X0X1
обсѣка/Y0Y1
обуя/T0Z7
обшия/T0Z7
огреба/X0X1
огриза/X0X1
окапя/X0X1
окая/Z0Z3
окѫпя/X0X1
омая/Z0Z3Z4
опаса/Y0Y1
опека/Y0Y1
опия/T0Z7
оплача/Y0Y1
оплюя/T0Z7
опозная/U0Z7
опра/Z0Z5
ора/X0X1X2
орева/X0X1
оскубя/X0X1
осмуча/Y0Y1
основа/X0X1
острижа/Y0Y1
остържа/Y0Y1
осъзная/U0Z7
осѣка/Y0Y1
отбия/T0Z7
отвия/T0Z7
отвлѣка/Y0Y1
отдамъ/X0X1
отеба/XXX0X1
отека/Y0
отзема/Z1Z5
откова/X0X1
открия/T0Z7
отмия/T0Z7
отмра/Z0
отнема/Z1Z5
отнеса/Y0Y1
отпия/T0Z7
отрая/Z0Z3
отрека/Y0Y1
отрия/T0Z7
отсипя/X0X1
отсѣка/Y0Y1
отхапя/X0X1
отчая/Z0Z3
отшия/T0Z7
отърва/X0X1
отямъ/Z0
отѫпча/Y0Y1
ощипя/X0X1
оямъ/Z0Z5
паса/Y0Y1Y2
пека/Y0Y1Y2
плача/Y0Y2
плюя/T0T2Z7
побая/Z0
побия/T0Z7
повия/T0Z7
повлѣка/Y0Y1
погреба/X0X1
подбия/T0Z7
подвия/T0Z7
подвра/Z0Z5
подема/Z1Z5
подзема/Z1Z5
подлъжа/Y0Y1
подмия/T0Z7
поднеса/Y0Y1
подочуя/T0Z7
подпека/Y0Y1
подпра/Z0Z5
подрия/T0Z7
подстрижа/Y0Y1
подсѣка/Y0Y1
подуя/T0Z7
подшия/T0Z7
подямъ/Z0Z5
поема/Z1Z5
позамая/Z0Z3
позапия/T0Z7
позасѣка/Y0Y1
позачуя/T0Z7
позная/U0Z7
позова/X0X1
поизкрия/T0Z7
поизкѫпя/X0X1
поизлѣза/Z2
поизмия/T0Z7
поизмра/Z0
поизнеса/Y0Y1
поизора/X0X1
поизпия/T0Z7
поизсѣка/Y0Y1
поизтрия/T0Z7
поизтъка/Y3Y4
покапя/X0X1
покая/Z0
покрия/T0Z7
полая/Z0
полуизямъ/Z0Z5
полъжа/Y0Y1
помая/Z0
помия/T0Z7
помра/Z0
понабия/T0Z7
понавия/T0Z7
понавлѣза/Z2
понадуя/T0Z7
понакапя/X0X1
понапека/Y0Y1
понапия/T0Z7
понаплача/Y0
понасипя/X0X1
понасѣка/Y0Y1
понатрия/T0Z7
понаямъ/Z0Z5
понеса/Y0Y1
пооблѣка/Y0Y1
поокапя/X0X1
поокая/Z0
поопаса/Y0Y1
поопека/Y0Y1
пооплача/Y0Y1
поопозная/U0Z7
поопра/Z0Z5
поора/X0X1
поострижа/Y0Y1
поостържа/Y0Y1
поосѣка/Y0Y1
поотбия/T0Z7
поотвия/T0Z7
поотека/Y0
поотпия/T0Z7
попаса/Y0Y1
попека/Y0Y1
попия/T0Z7
поплюя/T0Z7
попрѣсѣка/Y0Y1
попрѣямъ/Z0
пораздамъ/X0X1
поразплача/Y0Y1
поразсѣка/Y0Y1
поразтрия/T0Z7
поразтѫпча/Y0Y1
поразчуя/T0Z7
порека/Y0
посвия/T0Z7
посипя/X0X1
послъжа/Y0Y1
посмуча/Y0Y1
поспра/Z0Z5
посъвзема/Z1Z5
посѣка/Y0Y1
потека/Y0
потрая/Z0
потрия/T0Z7
потрѣса/Y0Y1
потѫпча/Y0Y1
поувлѣка/Y0Y1
почуя/T0Z7
поямъ/Z0Z5
привия/T0Z7
привлѣка/Y0Y1
привнеса/Y0Y1
придамъ/X0X1
придобия/T0Z7
приема/Z1Z5
призная/U0Z7
призова/X0X1
прикова/X0X1
прикрия/T0Z7
прилая/Z0
прилъжа/Y0Y1
примра/Z0Z5
принеса/Y0Y1
припека/Y0Y1
припия/T0Z7
припра/Z0Z5
присвия/T0Z7
присипя/X0X1
притека/Y0
пришия/T0Z7
прищипя/X0X1
приямъ/Z0
провлѣка/Y0Y1
провра/Z0Z5
прогриза/X0X1
продамъ/X0X1
прозра/Z0Z5
произлѣза/Z2
произнеса/Y0Y1
произтека/Y0
пролая/Z0
промия/T0Z7
проплача/Y0
проскубя/X0X1
просмуча/Y0Y1
простра/Z0Z5
просѣка/Y0Y1
протрия/T0Z7
проямъ/Z0Z5
прѣбая/Z0
прѣбия/T0Z7
прѣвзема/Z1Z5
прѣвра/Z0Z5
прѣвъзнеса/Y0Y1
прѣгриза/X0X1
прѣдамъ/X0X1
прѣдприема/Z1Z5
прѣдрека/Y0Y1
прѣдъвча/Y0Y1
прѣеба/XXX0X1
прѣзра/Z0Z5
прѣлъжа/Y0Y1
прѣмра/Z0
прѣнавия/T0Z7
прѣнаема/Z1Z5
прѣнеса/Y0Y1
прѣоблѣка/Y0Y1
прѣора/X0X1
прѣоткрия/T0Z7
прѣпаса/Y0Y1
прѣподамъ/X0X1
прѣпокрия/T0Z7
прѣпродамъ/X0X1
прѣсипя/X0X1
прѣснема/Z1Z5
прѣснова/X0X1
прѣстържа/Y0Y1
прѣсъздамъ/X0X1
прѣсѣка/Y0Y1
прѣтрепя/X0X1
прѣтъка/Y3Y4
прѣхапя/X0X1
прѣщипя/X0X1
прѣямъ/Z0
разбия/T0Z7
развлѣка/Y0Y1
раздамъ/X0X1
раздуя/T0Z7
раззема/Z1Z5
разкапя/X0X1
разкая/Z0Z3
разкова/X0X1
разлая/Z0Z3
размия/T0Z7
разоблѣка/Y0Y1
разора/X0X1
разплача/Y0Y1
разповия/T0Z7
разпродамъ/X0X1
разпростра/Z0Z5
разрева/X0X1
разрия/T0Z7
разсъблѣка/Y0Y1
разтека/Y0Y1
разтъка/Y3Y4
разтърва/X0X1
разтѫпча/Y0Y1
разузная/U0Z7
разшия/T0Z7
разямъ/Z0Z5
рева/X0X2
самозалъжа/Y0Y1
самоизямъ/Z0Z5
самоотрека/Y0Y1
самоубия/T0Z7
свия/T0Z7
свра/Z0Z5
сдамъ/X0X1
сдъвча/Y0Y1
сипя/X0X1X2
скапя/X0X1
скова/X0X1
скубя/X0X1
слѣза/Z2
смая/Z0Z3
смия/T0Z7
смуча/Y0Y1Y2
снема/Z1Z5
снова/X0X2
спека/Y0Y1
спра/Z0Z5
стрижа/Y0Y1Y2
стрия/T0Z7
стържа/Y0Y1Y2
стѫпча/Y0Y1
суча/Y0Y1Y2
съблѣка/Y0Y1
събуя/T0Z7
съвзема/Z1
създамъ/X0X1
съзра/Z0Z5
съсипя/X0X1
съсѣка/Y0Y1
сѣка/Y0Y1Y2
тека/Y0Y2
трая/Z0Z4Z6
трепя/X0X2
трия/T0T2Z7
трѣса/Y0Y1Y2
тъка/Y2Y3Y4
тѫпча/Y0Y1Y2
увия/T0Z7
увлѣка/Y0Y1
увра/Z0
укрия/T0Z7
умра/Z0
усуча/Y0Y1
утрая/Z0
утрепя/X0X1
ухапя/X0X1
ухая/Z0Z4
ушия/T0Z7
шия/T0T2Z7
щипя/X0X1X2
ямъ/Z0Z5Z6
